Hawaii, session 2025, SB227.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that the illegal use, possession, and distribution of fireworks continue to endanger public safety, property, and the environment in the State. Despite existing laws and enforcement efforts, the unauthorized use of fireworks persists, causing disturbances and posing significant risks to residents. On June 7, 2023, the governor signed Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, into law, establishing an illegal fireworks task force within the department of law enforcement.  The illegal fireworks task force was required to develop a comprehensive strategic plan to address the systemic problem of illegal firework trade and usage within the State.  The illegal fireworks task force submitted a final report to the thirty‑third legislature containing the task force's findings, recommendations, and proposed legislation, which included a recommendation that the legislature fund a new crime unit within the department of law enforcement to address illegal fireworks enforcement on a full-time basis. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish an illegal fireworks enforcement division within the department of law enforcement to enhance regulatory oversight, increase enforcement, and further coordination among agencies to combat illegal fireworks activities. SECTION 2.  Chapter 353C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§353C-     Illegal fireworks enforcement division.  (a)  There shall be established within the department an illegal fireworks enforcement division.  The division shall use the findings from the illegal fireworks task force established pursuant to Act 67, Session Laws of Hawaii 2023, as a basis for developing a comprehensive strategic plan to stop the importation and distribution of illegal fireworks and explosives in the State, promote compliance with the state fireworks control laws, and ensure the safety and security of critical infrastructure against the discharge of illegal fireworks. (b)  An administrator shall be the head of the illegal fireworks enforcement division and shall have charge, direction, and control of the division and all matters relating to the enforcement of illegal fireworks by the department, subject to the direction and control of the director; provided that the department and counties, or both, are authorized to enforce and administer the provisions of chapter 132D pursuant to section 132D-20." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to carry out the purposes of this Act, including: (1)  The operation of the illegal fireworks enforcement division; and (2)  The reimbursement of funds to law enforcement agencies for division-related law enforcement operations, including law enforcement personnel, overtime and other salary-related payments, charges for fuel, equipment, technology, and storage and disposal of confiscated fireworks. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the establishment of     permanent positions within the illegal fireworks enforcement division of the department of law enforcement as follows: (1) full-time equivalent (    FTE) division administrator position; (2) full-time equivalent (    FTE) state law enforcement investigator positions; and (3) full-time equivalent (    FTE) clerk position, who shall be exempt from chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of law enforcement for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000, and shall be repealed on June 30, 2028.